Utah statutes.
48-1-14.   Liability of incoming partner.

A person admitted as a partner into an existing partnership is liable for all the obligations of the partnership arising before his admission as if he had been a partner when such obligations were incurred, except that his liability shall be satisfied only out of partnership property.

